North Carolina, session 2025, SB93.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 23 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-336.2. Transfer of leave.
The State Board shall adopt rules and regulations that allow sick leave and vacation leave to
be transferred between a charter school and a local school administrative unit. Leave to be
accepted by a local school administrative unit must not result in leave being accrued at a greater
rate than the rate set by the Board."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-218.90(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(7) Charter school employees shall be eligible for the transfer of sick leave and
vacation leave as provided under G.S. 115C-336.2."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to individuals
employed by a local school administrative unit or a charter school on or after that date.
*S93-v-1*